test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-paradis_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - idet: # GAHPER
    idet+N+Sg+Nom: idet
    idet+N+Sg+Gen: ideda
    idet+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: idedimme
    idet+N+Sg+Acc: idedav
    idet+N+Sg+Ine: idedin
    idet+N+Sg+Ill: idedij
    idet+N+Sg+Ela: idedis
    idet+N+Sg+Com: idedijn
    idet+N+Pl+Nom: ideda
    idet+N+Pl+Gen: idedij
    idet+N+Pl+Acc: idedijt
    idet+N+Pl+Ine: idedijn
    idet+N+Pl+Ill: idedijda
    idet+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: idedijdasihtte
    idet+N+Pl+Ela: idedijs
    idet+N+Pl+Com: idedij
    idet+N+Ess: idedin
    idet+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: idedasj
    idet+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: idedattjasj
    idet+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: idedahtes
    idet+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    idet+N+Abe: [idedahtá, idedahti]

  Noun - tjavelk: # GAHPER
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Nom: tjavelk
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Gen: tjavelga
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: tjavelgimme
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Acc: tjavelgav
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Ine: tjavelgin
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Ill: tjavelgij
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Ela: tjavelgis
    tjavelk+N+Sg+Com: tjavelgijn
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Nom: tjavelga
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Gen: tjavelgij
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Acc: tjavelgijt
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Ine: tjavelgijn
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Ill: tjavelgijda
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: tjavelgijdasihtte
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Ela: tjavelgijs
    tjavelk+N+Pl+Com: tjavelgij
    tjavelk+N+Ess: tjavelgin
    tjavelk+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjavelgasj
    tjavelk+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjavelgattjasj
    tjavelk+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjavelgahtes
    tjavelk+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: tjavelgahtes
    tjavelk+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjavelgahttásit
    tjavelk+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjavelk+N+Abe: [tjavelgahtá, tjavelgahti]

  Noun - værált: # GAHPER
    værált+N+Sg+Nom: [værált, värált]
    værált+N+Sg+Gen: [værálda, värálda]
    værált+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [væráldimme, väráldimme]
    værált+N+Sg+Acc: [væráldav, väráldav]
    værált+N+Sg+Ine: [væráldin, väráldin]
    værált+N+Sg+Ill: [væráldij, väráldij]
    værált+N+Sg+Ela: [væráldis, väráldis]
    værált+N+Sg+Com: [væráldijn, väráldijn]
    værált+N+Pl+Nom: [værálda, värálda]
    værált+N+Pl+Gen: [væráldij, väráldij]
    værált+N+Pl+Acc: [væráldijt, väráldijt]
    værált+N+Pl+Ine: [væráldijn, väráldijn]
    værált+N+Pl+Ill: [væráldijda, väráldijda]
    værált+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: [væráldijdasihtte, väráldijdasihtte]
    værált+N+Pl+Ela: [væráldijs, väráldijs]
    værált+N+Pl+Com: [væráldij, väráldij]
    værált+N+Ess: [væráldin, väráldin]
    værált+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [væráldasj, väráldasj]
    værált+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [væráldattjasj, väráldattjasj]
    værált+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [væráldahtes, väráldahtes]
    værált+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: [væráldahtes, väráldahtes]
    værált+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [væráldahttásit, väráldahttásit]
    værált+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    værált+N+Abe: [væráldahtá, väráldahtá, väráldahti, væráldahti]

  Noun - tjálos: # ÅRES
    tjálos+N+Sg+Nom: tjálos
    tjálos+N+Sg+Gen: tjállusa
    tjálos+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: tjállusimme
    tjálos+N+Sg+Acc: tjállusav
    tjálos+N+Sg+Ine: tjállusin
    tjálos+N+Sg+Ill: tjállusij
    tjálos+N+Sg+Ela: tjállusis
    tjálos+N+Sg+Com: tjállusijn
    tjálos+N+Pl+Nom: tjállusa
    tjálos+N+Pl+Gen: tjállusij
    tjálos+N+Pl+Acc: tjállusijt
    tjálos+N+Pl+Ine: tjállusijn
    tjálos+N+Pl+Ill: tjállusijda
    tjálos+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: tjállusijdasihtte
    tjálos+N+Pl+Ela: tjállusijs
    tjálos+N+Pl+Com: tjállusij
    tjálos+N+Ess: [tjállusin, tjálon]
    tjálos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjállusasj
    tjálos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjállusattjasj
    tjálos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: tjállusahtes
    tjálos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: tjállusahtes
    tjálos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjállusahttásit
    tjálos+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjálos+N+Abe: [tjállusahtá, tjállusahti]

  Noun - julevsámegielak: # GAHPER
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Nom: julevsámegielak
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Gen: julevsámegielaga
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: julevsámegielagimme
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Acc: julevsámegielagav
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Ine: julevsámegielagin
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Ill: julevsámegielagij
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Ela: julevsámegielagis
    julevsámegielak+N+Sg+Com: julevsámegielagijn
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Nom: julevsámegielaga
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Gen: julevsámegielagij
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Acc: julevsámegielagijt
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Ine: julevsámegielagijn
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Ill: julevsámegielagijda
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: julevsámegielagijdasihtte
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Ela: julevsámegielagijs
    julevsámegielak+N+Pl+Com: julevsámegielagij
    julevsámegielak+N+Ess: julevsámegielagin
    julevsámegielak+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: julevsámegielagasj
    julevsámegielak+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: julevsámegielagattjasj
    julevsámegielak+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: julevsámegielagahtes
    julevsámegielak+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: julevsámegielagahtes
    julevsámegielak+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: julevsámegielagahttásit
    julevsámegielak+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    julevsámegielak+N+Abe: [julevsámegielagahtá, julevsámegielagahti]

  Noun - gintal: # GÁMAS
    gintal+N+Sg+Nom: gintal
    gintal+N+Sg+Gen: ginntala
    gintal+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ginntalimme
    gintal+N+Sg+Acc: ginntalav
    gintal+N+Sg+Ine: ginntalin
    gintal+N+Sg+Ill: ginntalij
    gintal+N+Sg+Ela: ginntalis
    gintal+N+Sg+Com: ginntalijn
    gintal+N+Pl+Nom: ginntala
    gintal+N+Pl+Gen: ginntalij
    gintal+N+Pl+Acc: ginntalijt
    gintal+N+Pl+Ine: ginntalijn
    gintal+N+Pl+Ill: ginntalijda
    gintal+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: ginntalijdasihtte
    gintal+N+Pl+Ela: ginntalijs
    gintal+N+Pl+Com: ginntalij
    gintal+N+Ess: [ginntalin, gintan] #short essive is not used by Inga
    gintal+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ginntalasj
    gintal+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ginntalattjasj
    gintal+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: ginntalahtes
    gintal+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: ginntalahtes
    gintal+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ginntalahttásit
    gintal+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gintal+N+Abe: [ginntalahtá, ginntalahti]

  Noun - gahper: # GAHPER
    gahper+N+Sg+Nom: gahper
    gahper+N+Sg+Gen: gahpera
    gahper+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gahperimme
    gahper+N+Sg+Acc: gahperav
    gahper+N+Sg+Ine: gahperin
    gahper+N+Sg+Ill: gahperij
    gahper+N+Sg+Ela: gahperis
    gahper+N+Sg+Com: gahperijn
    gahper+N+Pl+Nom: gahpera
    gahper+N+Pl+Gen: gahperij
    gahper+N+Pl+Acc: gahperijt
    gahper+N+Pl+Ine: gahperijn
    gahper+N+Pl+Ill: gahperijda
    gahper+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: gahperijdasihtte
    gahper+N+Pl+Ela: gahperijs
    gahper+N+Pl+Com: gahperij
    gahper+N+Ess: gahperin
    gahper+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gahperasj
    gahper+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: [gahperattjaj, gahperadtjaj]
    gahper+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: [gahperattjan, gahperadtjan]
    gahper+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gahperasj
    gahper+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [gahperattjam, gahperadtjam]
    gahper+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gahperattjasj
    gahper+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: gahperahtes
    gahper+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gahper+N+Abe: [gahperahtá, gahperahti]

  Noun - nager: # ÅRES
    nager+N+Sg+Nom: nager
    nager+N+Sg+Gen: nahkára
    nager+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: nahkárimme
    nager+N+Sg+Acc: nahkárav
    nager+N+Sg+Ine: nahkárin
    nager+N+Sg+Ill: nahkárij
    nager+N+Sg+Ela: nahkáris
    nager+N+Sg+Com: nahkárijn
    nager+N+Pl+Nom: nahkára
    nager+N+Pl+Gen: nahkárij
    nager+N+Pl+Acc: nahkárijt
    nager+N+Pl+Ine: nahkárijn
    nager+N+Pl+Ill: nahkárijda
    nager+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: nahkárijdasihtte
    nager+N+Pl+Ela: nahkárijs
    nager+N+Pl+Com: nahkárij
    nager+N+Ess: [nahkárin]
    nager+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: nahkárasj
    nager+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: nahkárattjasj
    nager+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: nahkárahtes
    nager+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    nager+N+Abe: [nahkárahtá, nahkárahti]

  Noun - áhkásj: # OAPPÁSJ
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Nom: áhkásj
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Gen: áhkátja
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: áhkátjimme
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Acc: áhkátjav
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Ine: áhkátjin
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Ill: áhkátjij
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Ela: áhkátjis
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Com: áhkátjijn
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Nom: áhkátja
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Gen: áhkátjij
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Acc: áhkátjijt
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Ine: áhkátjijn
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Ill: áhkátjijda
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: áhkátjijdasihtte
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Ela: áhkátjijs
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Com: áhkátjij
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Ess: áhkátjin
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: áhkátjasj
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: []
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    áhkásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Abe: []

  Noun - iehket: # SJIEVNNJET
    iehket+N+Sg+Nom: iehket
    iehket+N+Sg+Gen: iehkeda
    iehket+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: iehkedimme
    iehket+N+Sg+Acc: iehkedav
    iehket+N+Sg+Ine: iehkedin
    iehket+N+Sg+Ill: iehkedij
    iehket+N+Sg+Ela: iehkedis
    iehket+N+Sg+Com: iehkedijn
    iehket+N+Pl+Nom: iehkeda
    iehket+N+Pl+Gen: iehkedij
    iehket+N+Pl+Acc: iehkedijt
    iehket+N+Pl+Ine: iehkedijn
    iehket+N+Pl+Ill: iehkedijda
    iehket+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: iehkedijdasihtte
    iehket+N+Pl+Ela: iehkedijs
    iehket+N+Pl+Com: iehkedij
    iehket+N+Ess: iehkedin
    iehket+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: iehkedasj
    iehket+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    iehket+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: iehkedahtes
    iehket+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: iehkedahtes
    iehket+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: iehkedahttásit
    iehket+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    iehket+N+Abe: [iehkedahtá, iehkedahti]

  Noun - gierkav: # GÁMAS
    gierkav+N+Sg+Nom: [gierkav, gierkam]
    gierkav+N+Sg+Gen: gierkkama
    gierkav+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gierkkamimme
    gierkav+N+Sg+Acc: gierkkamav
    gierkav+N+Sg+Ine: gierkkamin
    gierkav+N+Sg+Ill: gierkkamij
    gierkav+N+Sg+Ela: gierkkamis
    gierkav+N+Sg+Com: gierkkamijn
    gierkav+N+Pl+Nom: gierkkama
    gierkav+N+Pl+Gen: gierkkamij
    gierkav+N+Pl+Acc: gierkkamijt
    gierkav+N+Pl+Ine: gierkkamijn
    gierkav+N+Pl+Ill: gierkkamijda
    gierkav+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: gierkkamijdasihtte
    gierkav+N+Pl+Ela: gierkkamijs
    gierkav+N+Pl+Com: gierkkamij
    gierkav+N+Ess: [gierkkamin, gierkan]
    gierkav+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gierkkamasj
    gierkav+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gierkkamattjasj
    gierkav+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: gierkkamahtes
    gierkav+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: gierkkamahtes
    gierkav+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gierkkamahttásit
    gierkav+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gierkav+N+Abe: [gierkkamahtá, gierkkamahti]

  Noun - gieles: # ÅRES
    gieles+N+Sg+Nom: gieles
    gieles+N+Sg+Gen: [gællása, gällása]
    gieles+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [gællásimme, gällásimme]
    gieles+N+Sg+Acc: [gællásav, gällásav]
    gieles+N+Sg+Ine: [gællásin, gällásin]
    gieles+N+Sg+Ill: [gællásij, gällásij]
    gieles+N+Sg+Ela: [gællásis, gällásis]
    gieles+N+Sg+Com: [gællásijn, gällásijn]
    gieles+N+Pl+Nom: [gællása, gällása]
    gieles+N+Pl+Gen: [gællásij, gällásij]
    gieles+N+Pl+Acc: [gællásijt, gällásijt]
    gieles+N+Pl+Ine: [gællásijn, gällásijn]
    gieles+N+Pl+Ill: [gællásijda, gällásijda]
    gieles+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: [gællásijdasihtte, gällásijdasihtte]
    gieles+N+Pl+Ela: [gællásijs, gällásijs]
    gieles+N+Pl+Com: [gællásij, gällásij]
    gieles+N+Ess: [gællásin, gällásin, gielen] # short essive is not used by Inga
    gieles+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [gællásasj, gällásasj]
    gieles+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [gællásattjasj, gällásattjasj]
    gieles+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [gællásahtes, gällásahtes]
    gieles+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: [gællásahtes, gällásahtes]
    gieles+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [gællásahttásit, gällásahttásit]
    gieles+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gieles+N+Abe: [gællásahtá, gällásahtá, gällásahti, gællásahti]
